© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.Medical terminology
1. B – Cutting into is the term “otomy”; surgical removal is the “ectomy”; a permanent
opening is the term “ostomy”; surgical repair is the term “plasty”. Some CPT books have
common medical terms like these listed in the first few pages of the book.
2. C – In your CPT book turn to the index and look up the word vaccination. Indented
beneath vaccination look for the abbreviation MMRV or the word Measles. You will see
the full description “Measles, Mumps, Rubella, and Varicella” and beneath it you will see
the abbreviation MMRV.
3. D – Each term listed can be looked up in the CPT book’s index (if they do not exist in the
index move to the next one). Beside the term magnetic resonance imaging you will see
the abbreviation MRI.
4. A – Knowing some medical terminology is useful here. The term “salp” means tube, the
term “ooph” refers to the ovary, and the suffix “ectomy” means to surgically remove.
Some CPT books have common medical terms like these listed in the first few pages of
the book.
5. D – This is a rare occasion when the answer is not located in one of the medical coding
books. I do know that this question (or one similar to it) often appears on the exam. I
suggest writing out the meaning of this acronym in coding guidelines for the eyes/ears
just before the code sets (65091-69990), or in the notes section just after the code sets.
6. C – The prefix “cryo” means cold, as in freezing.
7. D – The medical suffix –centesis means to puncture. Arthrocentesis is the puncturing and
removal of fluid from a joint. Amniocentesis is the puncturing and removal of amniotic
fluid from the amniotic sac during pregnancy. Pericardiocentesis is the puncturing of the
pericardium (sac surrounding the heart) and removing extra fluid with it. Paracentisis is
the puncturing and removal of fluid from within a body cavity.
8. B – The medical prefix gastro means stomach. The medical suffix –ectomy (option A)
means to remove. The suffix –otomy (option B) means to cut into. The suffix –ostomy
(option C) means to create a permanent opening. The suffix –rrhaphy (option D) means
to suture. Some CPT books have common medical terms like these listed in the first few
pages of the book.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.9. A – The term nephro and the term renal both refer to the kidney. Examples:
nephrolithasis (a kidney stone); renal calculi (a kidney stone).
10. B – The medical prefix myo- means muscle.
Anatomy
11. A – There are a few ways to look up anatomy questions. If your CPT book is issued by
the AMA (the most common CPT book) and is either the professional or expert edition,
then there is an anatomical chart for each organ system located with the coding guidelines
for each number set. In this case a skeleton diagram would be located in the coding
guidelines just before the musculoskeletal codes (20005-29999). If you do not have this
diagram try looking up the word radius either in the CPT or ICD-9 index and find a code
or a few codes near that term. Flip to those codes and look for a diagram.
12. B – The answer to this question can be found the same two ways as the explanation
above describes
13. C – Some CPT books will have a few diagrams located in the front of the CPT book.
These diagrams describe body planes, regions, quadrant, and directional terms (Ex.
Posterior). If your book does not contain these diagrams try looking up the term “femur,
fracture, and then each term (distal, etc.)” in the index. The terms that do not exist in the
index should indicate they are not the correct answer. Flip to the code provided for the
terms that are in the index and look at any anatomical diagrams. Ex. Femur, fracture,
distal gives codes 27508, 27510, and 27514. If a diagram is not provided remember that
CPT codes are sequenced from the top of the body down, so code 27508 is closer to the
hip (top of the body) and code 27514 is closer to the knee.
14. D – Again, look for an anatomical diagram first. Either in the front of the CPT or in the
guidelines of the digestive system. If no diagrams are provided in your book then try
looking up the term “abdominal” in your CPT or ICD-9 book and search for diagrams or
wording to help you.
15. B – This is another occasion that either you will find the answer in the diagrams in the
front of your CPT book, or your book does not provide them. If you do not have these
diagrams then this question would need to be an educated guess. Knowing medical
terminology could also assist here. In this case the term mid means middle.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.16. D – Prior to the digestive system coding guidelines is a diagram of the digestive system
that labels the duodenum (where the stomach first empties into the small intestine), the
Ileum, and the Jejunum. The cecum is also labeled; however, this is part of the large
intestine.
17. C- The round window is located in the inner ear and the oval window is located in the
middle ear. A surgeon can also create a pericardial window in the sac surrounding the
heart. If the term “round window” were looked up in the CPT index you would be lead to
code 69666 in the auditory system. Diagrams for code 69930 would indicate the location
of the round window.
18. B – Distal is the point of an organ or body part farthest from the point of attachment. The
term lateral means “away from the midline of the body” and the term Medial means
“toward the midline of the body.
19. C – The temporalis is located in the jaw and helps to move the tempromandubular joint.
The trapezius muscle extends from the occipital bone down along the thoracic vertebrae.
The teres the deltoid and the four muscles that make up the rotator cuff are the six major
muscles of the scapularhumeral group. The trigone muscle is a triangular smooth muscle
sensitive to expansion and in charge of signaling to the brain when relief is needed.
20. B – The cardia fundus is the junction that joins the cardia (the top portion of the stomach
closest to the heart) with the esophagus. The Latin term fundus means the portion of an
organ opposite from its opening (referring to the opposite end of the esophagus opening
and/or the portion of the stomach named the fundus, which is beside the stomach opening
and across from the stomach outlet).
Coding Concepts
21. A – Just prior to code 22840 there are some code specific coding guidelines. In the third
paragraph it states, “do not append modifier 62 to spinal instrumentation codes 22840-
22848 and 22850-20938”.
22. B – ABN stands for advanced beneficiary notice, and is a document that a patient signs
stating that they will pay for the procedure they are having done if insurance does not
cover it. This is something taught in a medical billing and/or coding class, or something
read in preparation of the exam. This answer is not located in one of the coding books.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.23. D – Wound exploration codes are 20100-20103. Directly above these codes is the wound
exploration coding guidelines. In the guidelines it states that the following components
are part of the codes description: surgical exploration and enlargement of the wound,
extension of dissection, debridement, removal of foreign bodies, ligation or coagulation
of minor subcutaneous and/or muscular blood vessel(s).
24. C – In the CPT book there are two types of descriptions: common and unique. The
common portion of a descriptor follows a code and end with a semi-colon (;). Any CPT
that share that description is indented beneath the code. Any portion of the description
following the semi-colon is the “Unique” portion of the descriptor and only belongs to a
single code. In this case code 24900 contains the common descriptor “Amputation, arm
through humerus”. Codes 24920 through 24931 share that part of the description and so
are indented beneath it with their unique portion of the descriptor beside them.
25. C – Medical necessity is what adjudicates, or justifies, a claim for payment. If a physician
wants to be paid for a laceration repair (CPT), then the ICD-9 code needs to describe a
situation that says it is necessary (ICD-9 should be a laceration or open wound).
26. D – Late effects codes are a type of E code. E codes and add on codes are never primary
codes and should never be coded by themselves. While V codes are not normally coded
as primary or stand alone codes they can be in certain circumstance.
27. D – Appendix E lists all CPT codes that are modifier 51 exempt. Also beside each code
in the tabular there is a convention that looks like a circle with a backslash through it.
This convention means that the code next to it is modifier 51 exempt. Code 45392 is the
only code not listed in appendix E and that does not have this convention beside it.
28. A – Category III codes are located between the Category II codes and Appendix A in the
back of the CPT manual. Category III coding guidelines state that these codes are to be
used before assigning an unlisted procedure code from category I codes.
29. D – Medicare parts A is hospital insurance and helps cover inpatient care in hospitals,
skilled nursing facility, hospice, and home health care. Medicare part B helps cover
medically-necessary services like doctors’ services, outpatient care, home health services,
and other medical services. It also covers some preventive services.
30. D – HIPAA has three rules; Privacy, Security, and Patient Safety. Standards for
transmitting PHI are not regulated by HIPAA but the security of this information while it
is being transmitted is. Once transmission rules are set HIPAA then set the standards on
how this information should be protected.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.ICD-9-CM
31. D – Following the hypertension table in the alphabetic index you would locate the term
kidney. Beneath kidney are several stages of kidney disease available. Select the option
describing stage I through stage IV and this will provide you with code 403.00. In the
tabular portion in the 5 th digit box there is a notation stating to “Use additional code to
identify the stage of chronic kidney disease (585.1-585.4, 585.9)”.
32. D – The correct open wound code is 881.10 because the wound has a foreign body. In the
alphabetic index under the term “open, wound” there is a box that describe when to use
the “complicated” option (this includes foreign bodies and infections). By selecting code
881.10 your choices are narrowed down to option B or D. Option B has an E code
describing a fall resulting in striking a sharp object. This is incorrect because she struck
the stove top (which was not sharp until it was broken by her fall). Option D’s E code
describes falling and striking an object and E920.8 describes being cut by broken glass.
33. B – Burn codes always have no less than three codes: A burn code, a total body surface
area code (948.XX), and an E code. You can have more than three codes but never less.
Burn codes have the following rules (which can be found at the beginning of the ICD-9
book under general coding guidelines), always code one location to the highest degree
(Ex. 1 st and 2 nd degree burns on the arm, only code 2 nd degree). When sequencing burn
codes always list the highest degree first (Ex. 1 st degree burns to the face and 3 rd degree
burns to the arm. List the arm burn first and then the face burn). Answer B is the answer
because its codes describe the highest degree burn to each anatomical location, it
sequences the burn codes in order of highest to lowest degree of burns, the 948 (TBSA
code) has the correct calculation when using the rule of nine (4 th digit burned to any
degree; 9 x 5 = 45; five areas burned are head, arm1, arm2, leg1, leg 2; 5 th digit describes
only 3 rd degree burns which are head (9), leg1 (9), and leg2 (9). 9x3=27). The E code
correctly describes the bonfire incident.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.34. D – Options B and C can be excluded because of code 650 which describes a normal
delivery and not prolonged delivery. Option A and D only differ by one digit in the first
code. Code 662.00 is incorrect because the 5 th digit 0 is for “unspecified as to episode of
care”. 662.01 is correct because the 5 th digit describes the patient having delivered. In
option D the description of the second code, 659, is described as “elderly”, and the
tabular explains what “elderly” is considered. In this case the term “elderly” includes a
pregnant woman who is 35 at the time of delivery. The 5 th digit 5 accurately describes a
woman’s first pregnancy, as depicted in this question.
35. A – Since both E codes, (E007.3 & E917.0), could apply to this situation it is difficult to
narrow down the options by focusing on them. You can use the anatomical diagram in the
CPT book if your book provides one, or you can use the common terminology provided
in the question. The patient presents with pain in his distal middle finger. Look in the
alphabetic index for the term fracture (the diagnosis), of the finger (the complaint of pain
in the finger directs you here if you don’t know what a “tuft” is). In the alphabetic index
under “fracture, finger” you will be provided with a few options as well as a cross-
reference (see also fracture, phalanx, hand). If you look up “fracture, phalanx, hand,
distal” you will find code 816.02.
36. B – Alcohol and drug abuse both are considered less severe than dependence since abuse
can be stopped voluntarily and because abuse eventually escalates to dependence;
Dependence is defined as “when one cannot voluntarily stop”. The three digit category
305 (in the tabular) also uses the description “nondependent abuse”. Since the patient is
stated as being dependent the 305 codes (like 305.71), would be incorrect. Since 305
codes are incorrect, option A and D can be ruled out. Also, since dependence
encompasses abuse it is not necessary to code both the abuse and the dependence
together, as it would be redundant; since option C codes both the alcohol dependence and
the alcohol abuse (309.81 & 305.00), it is redundant and incorrect. Code just the
dependence. Code 304 describes drug dependence. The 4 th digit 4 describes the correct
type of drug (amphetamine), and the 5 th digit 1 accurately describes his use as
“continuous”. Code 304.71 (in option C), is incorrect because it describes an opioid
instead of an amphetamine. Since the patient was not diagnosed with a general anxiety
disorder code 300.02 would also be incorrect. Since the patient is experiencing anxiety as
a symptom code 300.00 should be used. When the term “alcoholism” is looked up in the
index you are led to code 303.9x in the tabular. The 5 th digit 1 can be used here because
his “long documented history” can be considered continuous use. Beneath the 303
category (in the tabular), there is also a notation that states to use additional codes to
identify conditions, and lists “drug dependence 304.0 – 304.9, which should confirm your
304.41 code. Finally, code 309.81 accurately describes post traumatic stress disorder
(PTSD).
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.37. C – Diabetic manifestations codes are all accompanied by a notation in the tabular that
states to “use additional code to identify manifestation as”, and then provides a list of
codes to choose from. In our scenario the diabetic patient is experiencing an ophthalmic
manifestation (AKA: manifestations of the eye), which is code 250.5 with a 5 th digit. The
5 th digit is located in a box above code 250.0 and beneath the three digit category 250.
The 5 th digit is used to distinguish the type of diabetes (type I or type II) and describes if
it is controlled or uncontrolled. In our scenario the patient had type II diabetes (5 th digits
0 and 2) and it is uncontrolled (5 th digit 2). The full diabetes code should be 250.52,
which limits your options to B & C. There is also a notation in the tabular beneath code
250.5x that states to “use additional code to identify manifestation as”. Beneath this
notation is a list of examples that can be used. These codes should be used following the
250.52, not before it. We know this because the notation states they are “additional”
codes, as in a secondary. The list provided beneath code 250.5x includes “retinopathy
362.01 – 362.07”, which is what the patient was diagnosed with. By flipping to this code
range in the tabular and reading the description of each individual code we can determine
that code 362.01 is the best option mainly due to the description beneath it, which
includes “Diabetic Retinopathy NOS” (not otherwise specified). Directions beneath the
four digit code 362.0x also states that these codes should be the second code in the
sequence (code first 249.5x, 250.5x).
38. A – This is true according the ICD-9-CM coding guidelines, (found in the beginning of
the manual), under section I:B:7 which reads: Signs and symptoms that are associated
routinely with a disease process should not be assigned as additional codes, unless
otherwise instructed by the classification.
39. C – The coding guidelines, (found at the beginning of the ICD-9-CM manual), specify
the HIV coding rules in Section I; C; Chapter 1; A:1 and A:2:a-h. These guidelines state
that V08 should be coded for asymptomatic HIV that has no documented symptoms, and
may include the terms “HIV positive”, “known HIV”, and “HIV test positive”. These are
also extensive notations in the tabular portion beneath each of the HIV codes. Beneath
code 042 is and excludes notation stating this code excludes asymptomatic HIV and to
see code V08. Code 795.71 is used for unspecific pathology findings. The notation
beneath this code states that “this code is only to be used when a test finding is reported
as nonspecific. Asymptomatic findings are coded to V08....”. The notation beneath code
V08 verifies that this code should be used when no HIV infection symptoms or
conditions are present. Code 079.53 has a notation beneath its three digit category (code
079) stating that codes starting with 079.XX are additional code meant to be used “in
addition” to a primary code.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.40. A – The four digit category 692.7x indicates that codes starting with these four digits are
cause by solar radiation (sunburn). Code 942.24 is a burn code caused by something other
than the sun. Code 692.72 indicates a solar radiation burn causing an inflammation of the
skin (dermatitis). In our scenario there is no documentation of inflammation though.
Code 692.82 also describes dermatitis of the skin caused by radiation, but it is specific to
rays other than solar (Ex. Tanning bed, ultraviolet rays). Code 692.76 accurately
describes a second degree burn caused by the sun, without mention of inflammation
(dermatitis).
HCPCS
41. C – Options A and D can be eliminated when comparing codes A6204 and A6252. Code
A6204 states composite dressing is used and code A6252 states special absorptive sterile
dressing is used (which is correct). When choosing between options B and C code A6219
meets the correct size requirements and also has an adhesive border.
42. D – Option A is a plaster cast so it is incorrect. Option B is for a pediatric cast and it
states beneath the code that a pediatric cast is considered 0-10 years old, since the patient
is 12 this code would be incorrect. Option C meets most of the description but it is for a
splint and not a cast.
43. C – The correct answer is C for J9070. Neosar directs you to Cyclophosphamide 100 mg,
which is a Chemotherapy drug used intravenously.
Answer A for J9100 is for Cytarabine 100 mg, which is not the correct medication.
Answer B for J7502 is for Cyclosporine oral medication, which is an immunosuppressive
drug.
Answer D is J8999 and is a prescription oral chemotherapeutic drug and our patient is
getting IV infusion.
44. B – The title for each code range is listed at the beginning of its code sets. Example: B
codes start with code B4034 and right before this code is the B code set title “Enteral and
Parenteral Therapy (B4000-B9999)”. By turning to the first code in each code set listed
you can locate the titles. Note that there is a difference between orthopedic foot ware and
Diabetic footwear.
45. B – Code E1222 is the only option that states the leg rests are elevating (but not the
detachable and swing away style). Although the other codes describe similar chairs we
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.cannot code for something unless it is outright stated. Also, do not interpret that a “heavy
duty wheelchair” or a “high strength wheelchair” is needed because of the patient’s size.
E/M
46. C - The first thing to notice in this question is that no key components are provided.
Because of that we can eliminate any code with the three key component requirements.
Aside from the key components option A can also be eliminated because it is listed as a
New Patient. This patient comes in weekly which means she is established. Option B
requires key components which were not provided in this question so this can also be
eliminated. Option D describes a code used for patient on blood thinners and is described
in detail in the coding guidelines right above it. Option C, 99211, is listed under
established patients. This code states that the visit may not (necessarily) require the
presence of a physician or other qualified health care professional (such as LPN, MA).
However, physicians or other qualified health care professionals may use this code when
they provide this type of E/M. Code 99211 would apply in this circumstance since the
patient was seen by an LPN. The description of this code also gives a hint, as it states this
codes is for visits that are “typically 5 minutes”.
47. D – Option A and and C are incorrect because the observation codes listed here (99218)
are only for patients who are admitted and discharged on two different dates. Option B is
incorrect because the description beneath this code states it, “requires these 3 key
components: Comprehensive history, comprehensive exam, and moderate MDM”. The
physician performed only a detailed history and exam (not a comprehensive one).
Although his MDM was of moderate complexity he did not provide the other two key
components at the comprehensive level. Since the requirement of code 99235 is for al
three key components to be met and only one was, option B is also incorrect. Option D is
correct because codes 99234-99236 are used for patients who were admitted and
discharge on the same day (see coding guidelines directly above code 99234). Code
99234 also requires that all 3 key components are met. In this scenario the first two key
components (history and exam), met the requirement of being “detailed”. The third key
component (MDM), was also met and exceeded, since the physician went beyond
straightforward/low complexity MDM and went to moderate MDM code 99234 can be
used.
48. D – If you were to compare the 99291 codes in A and C to the 99471 codes in B and D
you would discover that the critical care code 99291, although good, is incorrect. The
99471 is for initial critical care for an inpatient pediatric (29 day old to 24 months). This
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.code is more specific since the patient was admitted (inpatient) and is only 20 months old
(pediatric). This then narrows down your options between B and D. B is incorrect
because it includes a charge for the intubation, which according to the pediatric critical
care coding guidelines, is a bundled service. The ICD-9 code 786.09 is also incorrect
because it does not include the “acute” status. ICD-9 code 518.82 accurately describes
“acute respiratory distress” and code 486 accurately describes pneumonia, unspecified.
49. D – The physician performed three services: Stand by, resuscitation, and an E/M. By
reading the descriptions of these codes and the guidelines provided for each code, you
can determine which of them can or cannot be code in conjunction with one another. The
coding guidelines for code 99360 state that the code “should not be used if the period of
standby ends with the performance of a procedure”. Initially you would think that this
would then rule out the use of this code since Dr. Smith did end up rendering a procedure
(resuscitation). However, there is a special notation in parentheses beneath code 99360
that states “99360 may be reported in addition to 99460, 99465 as appropriate”. The next
CPT code 99465 describes new born resuscitation in the delivery room. This was the
procedure that Dr. Smith provided, and is correct. The last code is 99460. This code
describes the new born E/M that the physician provided. This code has no special
notations or exclusions and is also correct. There is also a notation beneath code 99465
that states “99465 may be reported in conjunction with 99460”. This means that all three
codes can be used together.
50. D – Comparing code 99387 to 99397: Both are for an annual wellness exam, and
according to their descriptions, include age/gender appropriate history, exam, counseling
(ex. smoking cessation), guidance, risk factors, etc. Code 99387 is for a new patient
though and 99397 is for an established patient (both state the correct age). Since Mr.
Johnson is stated as being an established patient, options A and B can be eliminated
because of code 99387 (new patient). For options C and D you will then compare codes
99205 and 99215. Both of these codes describe an in-office E/M with a primary care
physician. Code 99205 is for a new patient and also requires all three key components to
be met. This code is incorrect because the patient is established (not new), and the MDM
provided was only of moderate complexity (this code requires high complexity MDM).
Code 99215 is for an established patient though, and although the MDM for this codes
states High and the physician only provided moderate, the codes description states that
only 2 of the three key components need to be met. Since the Comprehensive history and
exam were met, this code can still be assigned. This means option D, which includes both
99397 and 99215, is correct.
51. C – The answer to this question is found in the E/M coding guidelines under the 9 th
heading, labeled “Levels of E/M Service”. These guidelines along with the guidelines
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.found in this section under the heading “Time” (13 th heading), explain that the 6
components 1) History 2) Exam 3) Medical Decision Making 4)Counseling 5) Coordination of
Care 6) Nature of Presenting Problem or time (by itself), determines the level of an E/M service.
Anesthesia
52. C – A 13 month old child is over a year old so this rules out options B. Option C is more
specific than option A and meets our description. Option D is incorrect because it does
not describe a hernia repair, but repair of the backside of the abdominal wall.
53. A – The words diagnostic and arthroscopic are what leads you to answer A. While
answer B provides the correct anatomical description this is also for an actual procedure
(ex. Surgery), and not considered exploratory for diagnostic purposes. Answer C
describes an arthroscopic procedure but it is also for a surgery (not diagnostic). Answer
D describes the actual procedure that the surgeon performed, however we are only coding
the anesthesia for the anesthesiologist in this question.
54. C – The answer to this question is located in the Anesthesia coding guidelines under the
title “Time Reporting”
55. B – The lining surrounding the heart is called the pericardium, knowing this term helps to
narrow down the options. Code 00560 accurately describes the surgery that was
performed, however, this code is meant to be used for patients over the age of 1, and does
not include the oxygenator pump. Code 00561, in answer B, states that this code is for
children under 1 year of age and includes an oxygenator pump. When the age is specified
in the code’s description it is not necessary to add a qualifying circumstance code
(99100), re-stating the extreme age. Also stated directly beneath code 00561, there is a
notation stating “Do not report 00561 in conjunction with 99100, 99116, and 99135”.
This eliminates option D. Option C is incorrect because it does not describe surgery on
the pericardium, but on the great vessels of the heart instead.
56. C - By recognizing the patient’s age you can narrow down your options to A or C
(because of the qualifying circumstance code 99100 depicts extreme age, which is
patients under the age of 1 and over the age of 70). Qualifying circumstance codes can
also be located in either the Anesthesia coding guidelines and/or in the medicine chapter.
Knowing your medical terminology will also help you eliminate options here. Option A
describes a ten-otomy, the term “-otomy” means to cut into, or to make an incision.
Option B describes a teno-desis, the suffix –esis means to remove fluid. In our question a
repair was being done though. Code 01714 uses the term tenoplasty, and the suffix –
plasty means to repair. Option C and D provide the same code, but D does not list the
qualifying circumstance code 99100. Also the P modifier for severe asthma would be P3.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.57. B – The answer to this question is found in the bottom half of paragraph two in the
Anesthesia coding guidelines.
58. A – The qualifying circumstance codes (99140) is correct and narrows your choice down
to options A or D. Both A and D have the same P modifier (P5), which is correct. Codes
P5 and 99140 are correct because the patient is hemorrhaging and will bleed out and die
without the operation; the surgery is also stated as “emergency”. Option D describes an
unspecified code but option A describes a tubal ligation, including laparoscopic
procedures, which is what our scenario describes.
59. D – This question can be narrowed down by either the P modifier or by knowing some
medical terminology. The P1 modifier describes an otherwise healthy individual and P2
describes an individual with a mild systemic disease (P modifiers are listed in Appendix
A with all other modifiers). Since our patient was stated as “healthy” we can choose
P1which will narrow down your options to A and D. Option A is close, but unspecified.
Medical terminology reveals that option B describes an –otoscopy, which is the use of a
scope in the ear. Option C describes biopsies of intraoral locations, and the term oral
indicates the mouth. Answer D describes a biopsy (-otomy) of the eardrum (tympanum).
60. D – According to the Anesthesia coding guidelines under the heading “Time Reporting”,
anesthesia time begins when the anesthesiologist begins preparing the patient for the
induction of anesthesia and ends when the anesthesiologist releases the patient from his
care and is no longer in attendance. In our question this means the anesthesia time would
be from 8:15am until 9:30am, which is 1hour and 15minutes.
61. A – When facing a longer more complex question like this one it is easier if you can
eliminate some of your options. To eliminate two of your four options try to decide which
P status modifier is correct (P2or P3) or compare codes 813.42 and 813.52, since each are
appear twice in two different options. In this circumstance the P2 status modifier would
be correct since both systemic diseases (diabetes and asthma) are well controlled and
mild. The diagnosis code 813.42 is correct because the fracture is not stated as open (just
the procedure is stated as open). When a fracture is not stated as open or closed it should
be assumed as closed. By choosing both the P2 modifier and 813.42 diagnosis code, you
can eliminate options B and D. When comparing option A and C look at the two
anesthesia codes, 01830 and 01810. Code 01810 describes procedures for nerves,
muscles, tendons, fascia, and the bursa, but not the bone. In this case code 01830 would
be correct because it describes procedures performed on the distal radius bone (either
open or with a scope). Additional ICD-9 codes 250.00 and 493.90 are also correct.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.Integumentary
62. B – According to the laceration coding guidelines (above code 12001, titled “Repair
(closure)”), lacerations of the same depth and same anatomical grouping should have
their lengths added together and a single code should be selected. Since the arm
lacerations share the same anatomical location (arm), and both are of the same depth
(layered lacerations), their length is added together (2.5 + 4 = 6.5 cm). Code 12032 is the
correct code because it meets all three specifications: 1) Length = 6.5cm 2) Depth =
layered laceration 3) Anatomical Location = the arm. The facial laceration would have a
separate CPT code because it has a different depth (simple laceration) as well as a
different anatomical location (face). Code 12013 is correct because it also meets all three
specifications: 1) Length = 3cm 2) Depth = Simple 3) Anatomical Location = Face.
According to the laceration repair guidelines “When more than one classification of
wound is repaired, list the more complicated as the primary procedure and the less
complicated as the secondary procedure, using modifier 59.” Option B correctly
sequences the most complicated code first (12032), followed by the least severe code
(12013) with an appended 59 modifier. ICD-9 codes 881.00, 880.00, and 873.42 also
correctly describe uncomplicated lacerations of the forearm, shoulder, and face.
63. C - The removal of lesions are divided by the type of lesion. Benign and premalignant
lesions have on set of removal codes and malignant lesion removal has another set of
codes. Each set of codes are also divided by anatomical groupings, size, and the number
of lesions being removed. In this case the benign lesion of the scalp and premalignant
lesion of the neck will be coded with codes 17000-17250 and the malignant lesion of the
hand will be coded using codes 17260-17286. Sequencing our codes from the most
severe to the least severe, we will code our malignant ablation first, followed by our pre-
malignant, and finally our benign ablation. Code 17273 is accurate because it is listed
under the heading “destruction, malignant lesions, any method”. The anatomical
grouping starts at code 17270 (and includes the hand), and the specific code 17273
describes the size range 2.1cm – 3.0cm. Since our malignant growth was 2.5cm, this code
would be correct. The pre-malignant growth and benign growth are both coded under the
same heading, “destruction benign or Premalignant Lesions” (code range 17000 –
17250). Code 17000 describes the removal of the premalignant lesion only, (it does not
include benign lesions). There is no anatomical grouping here, just code s for the number
of lesions being destroyed. Code 17003 is an add on code that should only be used in
conjunction with code 17000 (see notation beneath code 17003). This code should not be
used with just another lesion destruction code (ex. 17273 & 17003). Code 17110 is used
to describe the removal of the benign lesion of any location, up to 14.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.64. D – When faced with multiple codes that seem similar there are two ways to determine
the correct code. Either choose the code that provides the most detail and remains
accurate, or look up the terms in the alphabetic index. In this case looking up the terms
“breast, cyst, puncture aspiration” in the index, will lead you to the code set 19000-
19001. Code 19000 also provides the most detail because it has a specific anatomical
location along with the correct description (a puncture aspiration).
65. A – The easiest way to determine exactly what was done during this procedure is to look
at the information at the very end of the operative note. Here we have the information
that is most important to us: simple linear closure was performed; two stages (described
as Mohs), were performed, and the number of sections in each stage are reported.
According to the Mohs microsurgery guidelines, repairs are not bundled into the
procedure and can be billed additionally. This means that the repair code 12002 (simple
repair, 6.5cm, scalp), is correct and we can eliminate options C and D. Options A and B
share three of the same codes, with one additional code in option A. So at this point the
question is do you need code 17315 or not? Going through the Stages and sections: Stage
I Section 1-5 is coded with 17311; Stage I Section 6 is coded with 17315; Stage II
Section 1-5 (only 2 sections were performed in our scenario) is coded with; And code
12002 describes the simple, 3.5cm closure of the scalp.
66. C – What the surgeon performed is a split-thickness graft. A split thickness graft uses the
epidermis and a portion of the dermis from healthy tissue, removes it from its original
location, but leaves a portion of it connected. The point of connection keeps the dermis
and epidermis alive and is used as the pivot point for the graft. Option A describes
something similar, but this is an adjacent tissue transfer (AKA: Flap Graft), which is
usually thicker than a split-thickness graft, and which usually involves transferring
underlying tissues. . Option B describes an auto graft. An autograft can come from a
donor site or from skin that is grown in a laboratory from the patient’s own cells. This
skin is then grafted to the defect. Option D describes a flap graft which is deeper than just
the dermis and can be rotated around a point, as opposed to just being flipped over.
67. A – For this question you need to read each code’s specific coding guidelines in order to
determine which services are bundled. The 64400 code describes a digital block,
however, this code would not be used because digital blocks are already built into the
reimbursement for a laceration code and/or a subungual hematoma evacuation. This
eliminates option B. Code 20103 states in the guidelines that this code is only used when
a penetrating trauma has occurred, and this injury is not penetrating. In addition, this code
describes extensive debridement, wound enlargement, major vessel ligation, etc. Minor
debridement, ligation, and exploration are already bundled into a laceration repair
code(see laceration coding guidelines), and since the question does not state that anything
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.above routine (minor) work was done we cannot use code 20103.This eliminates options
B, C and D. By default option A is the only choice left then. HCPCS modifiers F6 and
F7 are correctly used to depict each individual finger. These modifiers can be found in
Appendix A. Code 12042 accurately describes a layered finger laceration of 3 cm and
code 11740 accurately describes a subungual hematoma evacuation.
68. B – According to the lesion excision coding guidelines, (above code set 11400-11471),
“Code selection is determined by measuring the greatest clinical diameter of the apparent
lesion plus that margin required for complete excision (lesion diameter plus the most
narrow margins required equals the excised diameter)”.
69. A – True. According to the laceration “Repair (closure)”coding guidelines (above code
12001), under the heading “Definitions, intermediate repair”....“Single-layer closure of
heavily contaminated wounds that have required extensive cleaning or removal of
particulate matter also constitutes intermediate repair”.
70. C – Knowing a little medical terminology will be how you determine this answer. The
prefix auto- means “self”, and an autograft is a graft where the donor skin is from a
different site on the recipients own body. The medical prefix A means “without” and the
term cell refers to human body cells. The acellular graft uses both terms (a and cell)
which would mean without cells, and an acellular graft is in fact without human cells
because it is made of synthetic manmade materials. The medical prefix allo means
“other”. In the word allograft the prefix allo is referring to a graft from another human
being. Finally, the prefix xeno means “foreign”. In the case of a xenograft it is referring
to the graft being from a foreign species (Ex. Pig).
71. C – Code 97597 and 97602 are found in the medicine chapter and describe active open
wound care (Ex. Decubitus ulcers). Beneath the Active Wound Care Management coding
guidelines there is a notation that states “For debridement of burn wounds, see 16020-
16030). This eliminates options A and B. Code 16030 is used to describe the removal of
dead tissue on second degree (partial thickness) burns. Not only is the degree of burn
different, but in our scenario there was no mention of tissue removal, only cleansing and
incisions. This eliminates option D. Code 16035 describes an Escharotomy (note the
suffix –otomy means to “cut into”). An Escharotomy is a procedure performed on healing
third degree burns. Incisions are made into the thick dead tissue to keep underlying
nerves and vessels from being injured or constricted. Code 16036 is an add on code
which is used in conjunction with code 16035. This add on code should be used for each
additional incision. So code 16035 describes the first incision and code 16036 x2
describes the second and third incision.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.Musculoskeletal
72. D - Option A describes an open procedure instead of an arthroscopic one, so this option
can be eliminated. Option B is arthroscopic, but the procedure is a translpant (instead of a
repair), so this too is incorrect. The difference between C and D is the word “and” vs.
“or”. In our question the patient had both the medial and lateral meniscus repaired, so
code 29883 would be correct.
73. B – Open fractures do not always utilize “open fracture treatment” codes. In the ICD-9 an
open fracture means that the skin has been broken. In the CPT book “open” and “closed”
are term used to refer to the type of treatment. If the patient is taken to the operating room
and an incision is made in order to visualize the fracture, this would be considered “open”
treatment. If the physician manipulates the fracture without creating an opening it is
considered “closed treatment”. In this scenario the patient has an open fracture but
“closed fracture treatment” is utilized. Codes 25574 describe an “open treatment” and so
options A and C are incorrect. Option B and D both have the same CPT codes, but
different modifiers. Any procedure with a 90 global period can be broken down into three
portions: Pre-operative assessment and/or decision for surgery; Surgical (the actual
procedure); Post-operative follow-up care. In this scenario the fracture care has a 90
global period and can be broken down into these three portions. The E/M service is
considered the pre-operative evaluation and the decision for surgery since the patient has
to give consent to proceed, because of this the E/M should have the 57 modifier
appended. The 57 modifier describes “decision for surgery” (see appendix A). The 25
modifier is also appended to the E/M because of the additional procedure (12031,
laceration repair). The fracture care is considered the “surgical” portion of the package
and so modifier 54 is appended to the fracture care code. Modifier 54 is used to describe
“Surgical care only” (see appendix A). The HCPCS modifier RT is used to describe
which arm was receiving care. (See appendix A for RT modifier’s full description).
74. D – Knowing medical terminology will help you choose the answer for this question.
Specific medical prefixes usually fall under a specific heading, such as: the prefix –otomy
which means to “cut into”, is usually under the heading “incisions”. The prefix –ectomy
which means “to remove”, is usually found under the “excision” heading. The prefixes –
plasty and –pexy mean to repair, and so terms with these prefixes usually fall under the
heading “repair”, such as Scapulopexy. If you don’t know medical terminology you can
also try looking up the term scapulopexy in the index, which will lead you to code 23400.
Code 23400 is under the heading “Repair, Revision, and/or Reconstruction”.
75. B – The procedure being performed in this question is a trigger point injection. Codes
64400 and 64520 are used to describe nerve blocks. These are injections involving the
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.nervous system, instead of injecting muscles, as was done in our scenario. This eliminates
options A and C. Codes 20552 and 20553 both describe trigger point injections and both
codes include multiple injections. Code 20552 describes 1 or more injections into 1 – 2
muscles, and code 20553 describes 1 or more injections into 3 or more muscles. Since
only one muscle was being injected multiple times, code 20552 is correct.
76. A – Per. Paul Cadorette and the American Medical Association article titled “Coding
Guidance for Anterior Cervical Arthrodesis”, “When a spinal fusion (arthrodesis) is
performed, the first thing a coder needs to recognize is the approach or technique that was
utilized. With an anterior (front of the body) approach to a cervical fusion the incision
will be made in the patient's neck, so the key terms to look for are platysma, esophagus,
carotid and sternocleidomastoid. These structures will be divided and/or protected during
dissection down to the vertebral body. After dissection, the procedure can proceed in one
of three ways:
a. When the interspace is prepared (minimal discectomy, perforation of endplates)
then 22554 would be reported.
b. When a discectomy is performed to decompress the spinal cord and/or nerve
root(s) report 22554 for the arthrodesis along with 63075 for the discectomy
procedure.
c. When a partial corpectomy (vertebral body resection) is performed at C5 and C6
report CPT code 22554 for the arthrodesis with 63081 and 63082. Two codes are
reported because the corpectomy procedure is performed on two vertebral
segments (C5 and C6). CPT codes 63081-63091 include a discectomy above
and/or below the vertebral segment, so code 63075 (discectomy) would not be
reported if performed at the C5-C6 interspace.
Once the decompression procedure has been completed, a PEEK cage can be placed
within the interspace or a structural bone graft can be fashioned to fit the vertebral defect
created by the previous corpectomy. Insertion of the PEEK cage would be reported with a
biomechanical device code 22851. This code is only reported one time per level even if
two cages are placed at C5-C6. When a structural bone graft is used, determine whether it
is an allograft (20931) or an autograft (20938). The bone graft codes are only reported
one time per procedure and not once for each level. Finally, the physician will place an
anterior plate with screws (22845) across the C5-C6 interspace to stabilize the area of
fusion”.
Some guidance on coding such procedures can also be located in the Spine (vertebral
column) coding guidelines (above code 22010).
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.77. B – In this scenario each answer has the identical codes, only with different modifiers.
Modifiers can be referenced quickly on the CPT book’s front cover, and can be found
with a full description and guidelines in Appendix A. Guidance for this question really
comes from looking at the guidelines above the two codes that were provided. According
to osteotomy guidelines (above code 22206) when two surgeons work together as
primary surgeons performing distinct parts of an anterior spine osteotomy each surgeon
should report their distinct operative work by appending modifier 62 to the procedure
code.
78. D – “Fracture care”, as described by code 25600, includes pain management, fracture
reduction (if necessary), and initial stabilization. Since the patient came into the
physician’s office with a cast already in place we can deduct that the patient already
received initial fracture care. Coding 25600 would be inappropriate then, because the
patient was already charged for fracture care once. The physician performed only a cast
application, as described by code 29075. Option C is also incorrect. Although the
physician did remove the prior cast, it was never specified to be a full arm cast. I was
most likely a short arm cast, but you cannot draw assumptions when coding.
79. D – According to arthroscopy coding guidelines (found above code 29800), surgical
arthroscopies include diagnostic arthroscopies, (they are bundled), this means a
diagnostic arthroscopy cannot be billed in conjunction with a surgical one. If a diagnostic
arthroscopy turns into a surgical procedure, the surgeon can only bill for the surgical
portion. This would then eliminate code 29805, which appears on both options A and B.
Code 29819 has the correct description for the removal of a foreign body, in the shoulder,
by arthroscopy. Modifier 78 would not be appended because the patient is past his 90 day
global period, and there is no mention that this is the same surgeon who performed the
initial surgery.
80. B – Most CPT books (like the one published by the AMA and required by the AAPC for
the CPC Exam), have diagrams with detailed descriptions accompanying these codes. If
your CPT book has their diagrams, reading the detailed captions will direct you to the
correct code selection. In this scenario the diagram provided for code 28290 describes the
correct “medial eminence of the metatarsal bone” being removed, but since there is no
mention of the Kirschner wire used to stabilize the joint, this code is incorrect. The
diagram for code 28294 describes a bunionectomy but describes a tendon transplant
being an integral component of this procedure, and this was not performed in our
question. The diagram for code 28298 describes the removal of the “medial eminence”
and the Kirschener wire stabilization, but also includes the additional removal of several
bone wedges from the base of the phalanx. Our scenario describes the surgeon cutting
into the foot, moving tendons and other structures out of the way, removing the medial
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.eminence, stabilizing the joint with Kirschner wire, and closing the patient up. This is
procedure is best described by code 28292, and is accurately depicted in the
accompanying diagram.
Respiratory, Cardiovascular, Hemic and Lymphatic, Mediastinum, and Diaphragm
81. B – For this question we will look at the operative note first and explain what is being
done, then we will look at each answer and dissect the codes. The operative note
describes two coronary artery bypass grafts, one graft is a vein and the other is an artery.
The second paragraph describe how the patient was opened up, the dissection performed
to reach the heart, and the harvesting of a mammary artery that will be grafted to the
heart. The third paragraph describes the harvesting of a femoralpopliteal vein that will be
used for a graft on the heart. The fourth paragraph describes sewing the artery and vein to
the existing heart vessels prior to cutting the damaged portion out. The fifth paragraph
describes the patient being placed on a machine that will breathe and beat their heart for
them (cardiopulmonary bypass). Once this is done the surgeon cuts out the damaged heart
vessels and the ends of the new vessels are sewn to the exposed ends (anastomosis) of the
remaining heart vessels.
A chest tube is also place for fluid drainage during recovery. Paragraph six then describes
the patient being closed up and sent to recovery. In our scenario the opening and closure
of the patient are part of the main procedure and should not be reported separately.
Anastomosis is part of vessel grafting and is also bundled into the main procedure code.
Cardiopulmonary bypass is considered an integral part of open heart surgery and should
not be coded separately either. Placement of a chest tube is only billed when it is not part
of a larger procedure. Since a larger procedure was performed (CABG) the chest tube
will not be coded here. Vessel harvesting may or may not be coded in addition to the
primary codes depending in the type of vessel being harvested and the primary
procedure’s coding guidelines.
Option A: Code 35600 correctly describes the harvesting of an upper extremity artery
that will be used as a graft for the heart, however, in our scenario the mammary artery
was harvested and according to the CABG coding guidelines (above codes 33510, 33517,
and 33533) the procurement of any artery (except one from the arm) is already included
in the graft codes and should not be reported separately. This means that code 35600
cannot be used here. Code 35572 describes the harvesting of a femoralpopliteal vein.
The same CABG coding guidelines also tell us that a harvested vein is included in the
grafting codes and should not be coded separately unless it is a femoralpopliteal vein.
Since the vein that was harvested was a femoralpopliteal vein we are directed to use the
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.additional code 35572. Code 33533 is also the correct code and accurately describes a
single artery bypass done on a heart vessel (in this case the artery is the mammary and
the heart vessel is the descending aorta). Code 33517 is correct because it describes a
single vein being grafted when an artery is also being grafted during the same operation.
Code 32551 correctly describes the placement of the chest tube, however, the code
should not be use because the placement of a chest tube is bundled into (or included in) a
CABG. This is why there is a notation beneath code 32551 that says: “separate
procedure”. Code 36825 describes a procedure that joins two vessels (that are not on the
heart) by a method other than anastomosis. This was not performed in our scenario and
should not be coded. Code 33926 describes cardiopulmonary bypass being used during
the repair of an artery that links the lungs and heart (pulmonary artery); (see code 33925
for the common descriptor), this was not performed here and should not be coded.
Option B: Code 33533 is correct for a single artery graft to the heart. Code 33517 is an
add-on code for 33533 and accurately describes a single vein graft to a heart vessel when
an artery graft is also performed. According to the CABG coding guidelines code 35572
should be used for femoralpopliteal vein harvesting. The procurement of the mammary
artery, anastomosis, cardiopulmonary bypass and chest tube placement are all bundled
with the CABG codes and should not be coded separately.
Option C: Code 33510 describes a vein being grafted to a heart vessel when only veins
are being used. Since an artery and a vein were both grafted we would use code 33517
instead. Codes 33533 and 35572 were already established as correct (see description
under option A rational). Code 32551 (chest tube) is included in the CABG grafting
procedures and should not be coded separately. Code 36821 describes anastomosis
performed on vessels outside the heart for dialysis purposes, which was not performed
here and should not be coded.
Option D: Code 33510 is the only incorrect code for this option. Code 33510 describes a
vein being grafted to a heart vessel when only veins are being used. Since an artery and a
vein were both grafted we would use code 33517 in addition to the artery code 33533
instead of code 33510.
82. D – Option A and C share the same description and provide different age brackets and
options B and D share the same description and provide different age brackets. Option A
and C are both for kids five years and under. Since our patient is 50 we can eliminate
options A and C. The difference between the remaining options B and D is the
description “tunneled” catheter verses a “non-tunneled” catheter. A tunneled catheter is
one that enters the body, tunnels under the skin, and exits the body in a different place. A
non-tunneled catheter is one that enters the body and resides in the point of entry. Our
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.scenario describes the catheter entering and residing in/near the point of entry
(subclavian). Most CPT books (like the AMA’s professional edition) provide diagrams of
these procedures above or below the corresponding codes and include a short description
of the process. The diagram for code 36556 specifically states “the catheter tip must
reside in the subclavian, innominate, or other iliac veins...”
83. A – The right lung has three lobes so when two lobes are removed it is called a bi-
lobectomy and when the whole lung is removed it is called a total pneumonectomy. The
left lung only has two lobes (so the heart has room to expand). When one lobe of the left
lung is removed it is called a lobectomy and when two lobes are removed it is called a
total pneumonectomy (because the whole lung is being removed). Because our question
describes the left lung, code 32482 is incorrect. Code 32482 describes a bi-lobectomy,
but in the case of the left lung, that would be the entire lung (total pneumonectomy). A
pleaurectomy is the removal if the pleaura, not the lung or its lobes (32310). In our
scenario a total pneumonectomy was performed, and it was in an open fashion (not
laparoscopically- 32663).
84. A – In our scenario the surgeon took a biopsy of tissue from the mediastinal space using a
scope. Noting that a scope was used we can eliminate options C and D because these are
codes describing open procedures. The difference between option A and B is the
approach used. A thoracoscopy of the mediastinal space (32606) approaches through the
chest wall and then manipulate the scope from the thorax into the mediastinal space.
Mediastinoscopies (39400) approach by making an incision under the sternal notch at the
base of the throat and enter directly into the mediastinum.
85. C – Reading the notations below several of these codes is how you will choose the best
option here. Code 31237 states beside it “separate procedure”, which means if it was
performed at the same time as another procedure then it cannot be coded and is bundled
into the primary procedure. This means option A and B can be eliminated because this
code is listed. In addition, option B can also be eliminated because code 31201describes
an open ethmoidectomy and in our scenario it was performed endoscopically. In option C
and D code 31255 is correct and accurately describes an anterior and posterior removal of
the ethmoid sinuses. Code 31295 (in option D), was also performed and correctly coded,
however, beneath the code there is a notation that it should not be used in conjunction
with code 31267 (which is one of the correct codes in the answer too). Code 31267
describes the nasal polyp removal, and since we know that it cannot be used in
conjunction with code 31295, option C is correct. Option C can also be deduced by
reading the multiple notations beneath code 31256. The third notation states “for anterior
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.and posterior ethmoidectomy (APE), and frontal sinus exploration, with or without
polyp(s) removal, use 31255 and 31276”.
86. D – In this question the surgeon placed a permanent dual chamber pace maker. Code
33240 in option A describes a cardioverter-defibrillator instead of a pacemaker, this rules
out option A. Option B has the correct code 33208 to describe the pacemaker placement
with leads in both the atrial and ventricular chambers. Codes 33225 and 33202 are
incorrect though, because according to the pacemaker coding guidelines (found above
code 33202) and the notations below code 33208, transvenous placement of electrodes is
included in code 33208. Codes 33225 and 33202 should only be used when additional
electrodes are placed. Code 33213 in option C describes only the battery portion of the
unit being placed. The notation below this codes states that if electrodes are coded to use
33202 or 33203 (not code 33217, as given in option C). Option D accurately describes
the placement of both the pacemaker generator and the two transvenous electrodes.
87. B – According to the endoscopy coding guidelines (found above code 31231), “A
surgical sinus endoscopy includes a sinusotomy (when appropriate) and diagnostic
endoscopy.
88. C – Code 36217 in options A and B describes the selective catheter placement to the third
order, but in the wrong vascular family (36217 is for thoracic or brachiocephalic). The
correct family is the “lower extremity” (where the femoral artery is located). This
eliminates options A and B. Code 36245 includes the common descriptor belonging to
code 36247, and includes the correct “lower extremity” vascular family. Options C and D
provide the correct catherization code but provide different ultrasound codes. Code 37250
is used to describe the actual procedure, while code 75945 is used to describe the
supervision of the procedure and the interpretation of the ultrasound report/images. Since
we are billing for the actual service that was rendered, code 37250 is correct.
89. A – The “indirect” view refers to looking at the larynx in an indirect fashion, such as a
reflection. A “direct” view refers to looking directly at the larynx.
90. D – Code 38308 describes surgery done on a lymphatic channel instead of a lymph node,
so this code is incorrect. What the surgeon performed was a biopsy of a lymph node in
the armpit (axillia). Code 38500 describes a biopsy, but is for a superficial one. The
procedure describes dissection through the fascia (this covers the muscle), and the full
excision of the entire lymph node (which was then sent to pathology). Code 38510 has
the correct common descriptor, which begins at code 38500 and reads “Biopsy or
excision of lymph node(s);”. The unique descriptor of this code describes the location
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.being on the neck instead of the axillia though, so this code is also incorrect. Code 38525
accurately describes the biopsy/excision of the deep axillary nodes.
Digestive
91. D – The term esophagogastroduodenoscopy (abbreviated EGD) describes the viewing of
the esophagus (esophago), the stomach (gastro), and the duodenum (duodeno), with a
camera/scope (oscopy). Option A, 43202, describes an esophagoscopy with a biopsy, but
does not move farther than the esophagus. Option B, 43206, describes use of a special
type of optical endomicroscope (not mentioned in the description), and further, this code
does not describe a full EGD. Option C correctly describes an EGD, but a tissue sample
is not the same as obtaining cells through brushing or washing, since the physician
actually took a sample, this code is also incorrect. Option D, code 43239, uses the same
common descriptor in code 43235, but the unique descriptor (beside code 43239)
correctly describes the tissue biopsy. There may also be a diagram of code 43235 which
describes a scope going through the esophagus, stomach, and to the duodenum. This
diagram may also help narrow down the options to C and D.
92. C – By reading the Endoscopy coding guidelines (above ode 45300) and the
Colonoscopy “coding tip”(above code 45355) we can learn that a sigmoidoscopy is an
endoscopy that advances to the descending colon but no further, and a colonoscopy is an
endoscopy that advances past the splenic flexure , into the cecum, and may go as far as
the terminal ileum. The physician had planned to advance into the cecum, which means
he was going to perform a colonoscopy. He chose not to perform the entire colonoscopy
though, due to unforeseen circumstances (fecal impaction). According to “coding tip”
coding guidelines (above code 45355 in the AMA Professional Edition), we should still
code for the colonoscopy and then add modifier 53 to indicate that the entire procedure
was not completed. This means that code 45378 with a 53 modifier is correct.
93. A – The operative note describes the open repair of a unilateral inguinal hernia with
mesh placement (Marlex patch). Code 49505 accurately describes the repair of a
unilateral inguinal hernia (open) and includes the mesh placement (see hernia coding
guidelines above code 49491 which state in the fourth paragraph “With the exception of
the incisional hernia repairs (49560-49566) the use of mesh or other prostheses is not
separately reported”). Beneath code 49507 there is a notation stating that if a simple
orchiectomy (removal of a testicle) is also performed during the hernia repair, that codes
49505 and/or 49507 should be used in conjunction with code 54520. In our scenario an
orchiectomy was not performed though, so using codes 49505 or 49507 with code 54520
would be incorrect. This eliminates options B and D. Code 49568 describes the use of
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.mesh during the repair of an incisional or venteral hernia only (our hernia was inguinal),
and beneath this code is a list of the CPT codes it should be used in conjunction with.
Code 49505 is not included in that list. Also, remember the hernia coding guidelines
(above code 49491) states that “with the exception of the incisional hernia repairs (codes
49560-49566) the use of mesh or other prostheses in not separately reported”.
94. A – This information can be found above code 40800 under the heading “Vestibule of
Mouth”. If looking up the term “vestibule” in the index you are told to see “mouth,
vestibule of”. Looking up this term should lead you near code 40800, where you will find
the description of a vestibule (above the code).
95. A – The digestive system is made up of two portions: the alimentary canal, and the
accessory organs. The alimentary canal starts at the mouth and ends at the anus. The
alimentary canal is also what food passes through during the digestive process. Parts of
the alimentary canal include the mouth, esophagus, stomach, and intestines. Accessory
organs are organs that aid in digestion but do not come in direct contact with the food.
Accessory organs include the gallbladder, liver, and pancreas. This information is not
listed in the CPT book. Since the AAPC allows notations to be made in your books, it is a
good idea to make a notation regarding this beside your digestive system diagram (prior
to code 40490 and following code 39599).
96. C – Codes 42826, 42831, and 42836 are all used to describe when either a tonsillectomy
or an adenoidectomy are performed. When the two are performed together code 42821
would be reported. This is because items such as anesthesia, opening the patient up, and
closing the patient may be bundled with the surgery code. Since the surgeon would only
need to make one incision and close the patient up only once, even when removing two
organs, the removal of both are bundle under the same code. Choosing both a
tonsillectomy code (42826) and an adenoidectomy code (42831 or 42836) the surgeon
would be reimbursed twice for services he only performed once (ex. Incision, dissection,
closure).This then eliminates options A and B. Code 42821 also does not need modifier
50 appended because the code is used for a total tonsillectomy and total adenoidectomy,
not a unilateral one. Had this been a unilateral procedure it would either state it in the
description or there would be a notation below the code regarding the use of modifier 50.
ICD-9-CM code 463 correctly describes acute tonsillitis, which is an inflammation and
not the same thing as an abscess, which is described by code 475. Code 474.0 is incorrect
because it has a 5 th digit available which was not used. Coding guidelines state that if a
5 th digit is available it must always be used, thus code 474.0 is incorrect, but code 474.02
is correct.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.97. A – The operative note describes an endoscopic percutaneous gastrostomy tube
placement. Code 43246 describes this correctly (see code 43235 for the common
descriptor). Modifier 62 is needed because Dr. Smith only performed the tube placement.
If he were to charge code 43246 with no modifier he would be reimbursed for the EDG
as well. Since Dr. Brown performed the EDG potion of this code he would also charge
code 43246-62. This way each physician is reimbursed half. Code 49440 describes a non-
endoscopic gastostomy tube placement. Code 43752 is also a non-endoscopic procedure.
Code 43653 is a laparoscopic procedure, which means they created a small incision
through which the camera entered the body; instead of an endoscopic procedure, which
enters the body through an existing opening (ex. mouth).
98. C – Code 43756 is not used for evacuation of stomach contents, but for things like bile
studies. The duodenum is also where the stomach and small intestine connect, which was
not mentioned in our scenario. Code 43752 describes the placement of a permanent tube
that is meant not for evacuation, but for introducing nutrients or medication into the body.
Code 43753 is the correct code. Gastric intubation is the introduction of a tube into the
stomach and aspiration is synonymous with evacuation. Some CPT books (like the
AMA’s professional edition) have an added diagram of this code and a detailed
description that includes key terms like: “large-bore gastric lavage tube” and “evacuation
of stomach contents”. It also includes examples of why this code would be used,
including poisonings. Option D describes a gastric intubation as well (which was
performed here), but this code it is only performed for diagnostic purposes, not to correct
an already known problem (which would be therapeutic).
99. B – Endoscopies (not laparoscopies) performed in the digestive chapter run between
codes: 43200-43273; 44360-44397; 45300-45392; 46600-46615; and 47550-47556.
There is a convention to the right of these codes that looks like a target, and they are there
to indicate that moderate sedation is already included in that particular CPT code, and
therefore cannot be coded separately. The definition to this convention can be located in
the front of the CPT book (Introduction, page xii in the AMA’s Professional Edition), or
at the bottom of each page in the CPT book. While the majority of the codes have this
convention beside them there are some that do not, for example, codes: 45300; 45330;
45331; 46600-46615; 47550-47556. All codes that include moderate sedation are also
listed in the back of the CPT book in Appendix G. By referencing Appendix G, you will
also see that codes 45300; 45330; 45331; 46600-46615; and 47550-47556 are not listed
as including moderate sedation.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.100. A – According to the Bariatric surgery coding guidelines (above code 43770), a lap band
adjustment consists of changing the restrictive band’s diameter by injecting or aspirating
fluid through a subcutaneous port. Because this description is beneath the laparoscopic
heading the procedure code for this should also be under the laparoscopic heading.
Option B (43886) is an open procedure which would require sedation and an incision.
The code’s description also describes a revision to the actual port, not the lap band.
Option C (43842) is also an open procedure which would require the patient to be in an
operating room. This code describes the placement of a restrictive device, not the revision
of one that is already in place. Option D (43848) is also an open procedure code and
describes the revision of the restrictive procedure, and not the revision of a restrictive
device. Code 43771 in option A correctly describes a laparoscopic procedure (through an
existing port) for the revision of an already placed restrictive device.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.Urinary, Male Genital, and Female Genital Systems, and Maternity Care and Delivery
101. D – This question describes a patient with renal calculi (kidney stone) and the procedure
that breaks the stone into smaller pieces, which is called lithotripsy. The term “lith”
means stone and the term “trip” means to break. Code 50590 describes the use of the
lithotripsy wave machine (C-Arm image intensifier) to send shock waves from the
outside of the body in (extracorpeal). This code may also have a diagram describing
lithotripsy in more detail. Radiology codes, such as 74425 and 76770 were not utilized
here. Code 50081 describes a percutaneous procedure that enters the kidney from the
outside (likely using a needle), and then retrieves the stone, without destroying it. Codes
50060 & 50130 both describe open procedures. The suffix –otomy means to cut into. The
terms nephrolithotomy and pyelolithotomy both mean to cut into the kidney (nephro and
pyelo both mean kidney) and remove a stone (lith). Since neither an open procedure nor
incisions were made in our scenario, these codes are also incorrect.
102. B – Code 57155 describes the placement of small radioactive elements, which are left in
the patient for the course of treatment prescribed and then later removed. Code 57156
describes the insertion of a vaginal radiation afterloading apparatus for clinical
brachytherapy. This code should be used for the placement of vaginal cylinder rods, or
similar afterloading devices. This procedure is also typically performed in a post-
hysterectomy patient. An “afterloading apparatus” is described as a technique where the
radioactivity is loaded after proper placement of the apparatus has been confirmed. The
rods (or afterloading device) should have an access port on the outside of the body which
can then be hooked up to an external machine which can deliver either high dose or low
dose rate brachytherapy. Although the patient recently had a hysterectomy it does not
state exactly how long ago or by whom, and since we cannot assume anything modifier
58 is not applied.
103. D – Our scenario in this question is describing a vasectomy. Option A describes the
“ligation” of the vas deferens, which is one form of a vasectomy that ties off, or
strangulates, the vas deferens in order to block the exit of semen. This procedure does not
require any dissection or removal of the tube though, as is described in our scenario.
Option B and C are used to describe a vasectomy reversal. As the two suffixes imply;
-ostomy means to create a permanent opening (as in opening a ligated vas deferns) and
–orraphy means to repair. Depending on the version of the CPT book you own, you may
be able to locate common terms like these in the front of the manual (ex. AMA
professional edition on page xiv). Code 55250 in option D accurately describes the
performance of a vasectomy, unilateral or bilateral.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.104. B – Option A is a laparoscopic procedure and in our scenario an open procedure was
performed. Option C describes a total nephrectomy (removal of the whole kidney) along
with the removal of part of the uterus and a rib resection (which is a removal of a portion
or all of the rib). In our scenario only a portion of the kidney was removed, and there is
no mention of the uterus or ribs being removed (only dissected through). Code 50290 in
option D describes the removal of a perinephric cyst, which is an accumulation of fluid in
a cyst like mass between the kidney and surrounding capsule. There is no mention of a
perinephric cyst in our scenario, so this is also incorrect. In our scenario a portion of the
kidney (which contained the tumor), was removed in an open fashion. The term nephro-
means kidney and the suffix –ectomy means to remove. This is accurately described by
code 50240, Nephrectomy, partial. Common prefixes, Root Words, and Suffixes may be
located in the beginning of your CPT book.
105. B - For twin gestation, report the deliveries separately with no modifier on the first and
modifier 51 on the second. If all maternity care was provided, report the global obstetric
(OB) service for the first infant (that is the antepartum/postpartum care), and report the
appropriate delivery-only code for the second infant using modifier 51. This means that
code 59618, which describes a cesarean delivery, after a previous cesarean delivery, and
a vaginal birth attempt (according to the coding guidelines above code 59610), and
includes the antepartum and postpartum care would be correct for the first infant. Code
59620-51 would be correct for the second infant born since antepartum and postpartum
care was not provided twice (just once to one patient). Modifier 51 indicates multiple
procedures are being billed and this is not the primary procedure. Modifier 22 on the
single code 59618 would not be correct because a single procedure requiring more work
was not performed, what was performed was two individual procedures requiring the
standard amount of. Code 669.71 is correct Code V27.2 is correct and states that this
code is meant for use in the maternal record and not the infants. Code V91.01. Code
651.01 accurately describes the patient as having twin gestations and delivering during
this encounter, this code also includes a notation indicating that a code from range
V91.00 – V91.99 is needed. In this scenario code V91.01 is the correct choice. Code
644.21 accurately describes the patient as having premature labor (prior to 37 completed
weeks of gestation) and delivering during this encounter. Code 669.71 accurately
describes the complication of vaginal labor resulting in a cesarean delivery. Three digit
category V27 indicates these codes are to be used as a result of delivery in the maternal
health record. Code V27.2 accurately describes two babies born alive. Code V31.1 would
be incorrect because this code is meant for the infant’s health care chart, not the maternal
record.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.106. A – According to the maternity care and delivery guidelines (prior to code 59000), in
the middle of the fourth paragraph, “ When reporting delivery only services (59409,
59514, 59612, and 59620), report inpatient post delivery management and discharge
services using Evaluation and Management service codes.
107. C – PSA is an antigen tested in males to detect prostate cancer. Any reading over 10 is
considered high. In this scenario the patient is having a prostate biopsy performed to
determine is he has prostate cancer or benign prostate hypertrophy. Option A describes a
needle or catheter being place by the transperineal approach, for the purpose of entering
small radioactive elements into the body to kill cancerous cells. Option B also describes
a transperineal approach with the use of a needle for a prostate biopsy, however, it also
describes a sterotactic template guided saturation sampling. A saturation biopsy is an
alternative technique utilized by urologists to detect cancer in high risk patients by taking
multiple samples (usually 30 or more). This code also includes the imaging guidance so a
70000 code (like 76942) should not be coded in addition to it. Code 55705 in option D is
used to describe a biopsy taken by an open procedure. This would include an incision and
repair. Code 55700 accurately describes a prostate biopsy, by needle or punch, by any
approach (including retroperineal). Notations beneath this code also direct you to code
76942 for ultrasonic guidance if performed.
108. A - A hydrocele is a pathological fluid filled sack within the scrotum. This question
describes a bilateral hydrocelectomy of the tunic vaginalis. What makes this question
more difficult is that medicinally a hydrocelectomy and a hydrocele repair are sometimes
used synonymously. Code 54861in option B describes a procedure removing both of the
Epididymis tubes and has no mention of a hydrocele, so this easily rules out option B.
Code 55000-50 in option C describes a procedure performed on both tunic vaginalis, but
it is a puncture aspiration (a hole punched with a needle to drain the fluid), so this can be
ruled out as well since our physician performed an incision and dissection. Code 55060 in
option D and code 55041 in option A comes down to the type of procedure and its details.
Code 55060 is a “bottle type procedure, also known as “Andrews Procedure”. This
procedure requires a 2-3cm incision in the hydrocele sack near the superior portion (or
top) and requires tacking the cut edges around the cord structures, leaving the everted sac
open. Also, when choosing between these two codes note the heading each one is under.
Code 55041 is under the “Excision” heading and code 55060 is under the “Repair”
heading. In a hydrocele excision (code 55041) the majority of the sac is removed. In a
hydrocele repair (code 55060) the sac is cut open and the edges are tacked back. The
procedure is also stated as being a “hydrocelectomy” and the suffix –ectomy means to
remove (similar to the excision).
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.109. B – Code 51797 should not be used without its primary code. Beneath code 51797 it
states that this code should be used in addition to either code 51728 or 51729. Since
options A and C utilized code 51797 without its primary code these two options are
incorrect. Code 51729 utilizes the common descriptor next to code 51726 but also
include its own unique descriptor “with voiding pressure studies”, making its full
description “Complex cystometrogram (i.e. Calibrated electronic equipment); with
voiding pressure studies”. Code 51797 is an add-on code describing the “intra-
abdominal” portion and notes that it should be used in addition to code 51729. This
would make the codes in options B and C both correct. According to the Urodynamics
coding guidelines (above code 51725), if the physician did not provide the equipment and
is simply operating it and interpreting the report then modifier 26 should be added to
these codes. Since they physician in our scenario is utilizing hospital equipment and not
his own adding modifier 26 would be correct.
110. C – Code 58976 describes the transfer of an already fertilized egg within the fallopian
tube, in our scenario the eggs are unfertilized though, and they are being harvested from
the ovarian follicles (not transferred). Code 58672 is a laparoscopic procedure (instead of
a percutaneous one), and describe the repair of a fimbio. Code 58970 correctly describes
the harvesting of the unfertilized eggs from the ovarian follicle with the use of an
ultrasonic guided needle. Beneath this code there is a notation stating code 76948 is to be
used for radiological supervision and interpretation. Code 58940 is used to describe the
removal of one or both ovaries.
Endocrine, Nervous, Ocular, and Auditory Systems
111. B –The only way to find the answer for this question is to use the anatomical diagrams
in the auditory chapter. There are two diagrams in the auditory chapter that have pictures
of the ossicles. One diagram depicts a tympanoplasy (codes 69635 – 69646), and the
other diagram depicts a tympanostomy (codes 69433-69436). Although the ossicles are
not labeled individually, they are labeled “auditory ossicles”. Using the picture of the
three ossicles you can then look at a second diagram of the ear, located in the auditory
coding guidelines (prior to code69000). The same picture of the three ossicles is shown,
but this time they are labeled individually as the Incus, Malleus, and Stapes. Writing the
terms hammer, anvil, and stirrup beneath these three diagram may be useful when taking
the CPC Exam, (this is an AAPC approved notation; these diagrams are in the AMA’s
Professional CPT Edition, 2012).
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.112. C – Code 62160 in options A and D describe the use of a neuroendoscope, which was
not mentioned in our scenario, so these options are in correct. Options B and C are very
similar, but code 61210 describes a burr hole and code 61107 describes a twist drill hole.
The difference is that a burr hole is created with an electronic drill and a special bit, and
the twist drill is a manually operated hand tool that is twisted to make a hole. Code 61107
also describes a puncture method (performed with a needle) instead of an incision made
with a scalpel.
113. A – Code 63040 is for a laminectomy (-ectomy meaning removal, of the lamina) and a
partial facetectomy (-ectomy meaning removal, of the facet), with nerve decompression,
and with or without removal of herniated a disc. Choosing option A as your answer
would be done by focusing on key phrases in this question, such as: “the ligamentum
flavum, lamina, and fragments of a ruptured C3-C4 intervertebral disc were all removed”
and “the surgeon removed a portion of the facet”, and “to relieve the compressed nerve”.
Code 63075 in option B describes an anterior approach (approaching from the front of
the body), since our scenario describes a posterior approach (approaching from the back
of the body), we know this code is incorrect. In addition, this code also describes the
removal of a herniated disc, which would require the sternocleoidmastoid muscle and
carotid artery being retracted, the removal of the disc, and a T shaped graft from the
ilium. These things were not described in our scenario though. Code 63081 describes a
vertebral corpectomy, which is the removal (-ectomy) of the vertebral corpus. A
corpectomy would require the surgeon would incise the dura and locate denated
ligaments and section them. Closure could or could not include a graft. Code 63170 in
option D describes a laminectomy (removal of the lamina) with a myelotomy (myle
meaning muscle and -otomy meaning to cut into). This procedure includes the
laminectomy describes in our scenario, but in addition the surgeon incises the dura and
the outer white matter of the spinal cord, which was not performed.
114. C – A keratoplasty means to repair the cornea (kerato means cornea and –plasty means
repair). A keratoplasty of the anterior lamellar is a surgical procedure that removes the
corneal stroma down the descemet’s membrane. This is a partial thickness graft that
preserves the two inner most layers of the cornea. Keratomileusis (kerato meaning cornea
and mieusis meaning to carve or shape), is a type of lasik eye surgery. Here the
ophthalmologist creates a flap of corneal tissue, then uses a laser to remold the original
cornea, and then the cornea flap is replaced. Keratophakia (kerato meaning cornea and
phakia meaning lens), is the procedure described in our scenario (which uses a donor
lens). Keratoprosthesis (kerato meaning cornea and prosthesis meaning an artificial
substitute) is the replacement of the cornea with an artificial one that is bio-engineered.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.115. C – The endocrine system codes start with code 6000 and end with code 60699. The first
heading in the endocrine chapter is “thyroid gland”. Following the codes through the
chapter you come to code 60500 and the next (and final) heading (directly above this
code), which reads “Parathyroid, Thymus, Adrenal Glands, Pancreas, and Carotid Body”.
The only organ not listed in the endocrine chapter is the Lymph nodes, which are part of
the hemic-lymphatic system located at the end of the 30000 codes.
116. C – The coding guidelines above code 69990 (operating microscope) state that it should
not be coded in addition to multiple codes. Among the codes listed is code range 65091 –
68850. Since both code 67107 and 67101 are within that code range the operating
microscope should not be coded with them. This eliminates options B and D. Code 67101
and code 67107 differ little, but code 67107 does include the terms “sclera buckling” and
“with or without implant”. The band placed around the eye causes sclera buckling and in
scenario there was not an implant. This code is also further explained in some CPT
books that contain diagrams.
117. C – The neurosurgeon performed a crainiotomy (he cut into the skull; Craini means head
and –otomy means to cut into), and drained an intracerebellar hematoma (which is a
collection of blood). Code 61154 describes the burr hole accurately, but no craniotomy, it
also describes the evacuation of the hematoma correctly, but it is missing the location
(intracerebellum). This means you can eliminate options A and D. Code 61315 correctly
describes the scenario, “Craniectomy or crainiotomy for evacuation of hematoma,
infratentorial; intracerebellar. Although the neurosurgeon did create a burr hole during
the procedure, notations beneath code 61253 state that “if burr holes or trephine are
followed by a crainiotomy at the same operative session, use 61304-61321; do not use
61250 or 61253”.
118. D – The main difference in these codes are the specific nerve being decompressed. Code
64702 is the description of a nerve decompression for a finger or toe. Code 64704 is also
a nerve decompression, but for a hand or foot. Code 64719 is the code used for a nerve
decompression of the ulnar nerve of the wrist. Code 64721, which is described in our
scenario, is the nerve decompression of the median nerve, also known as carpal tunnel
surgery.
119. B – The procedure performed is a repair to a fistula in the round window. Code 69666
and code 69667 both accurately describes this procedure, but code 69666 is performed on
the oval window and code 69667 is performed on the round window. Options A and C
can be ruled out, because they describe they utilize the oval window code instead of the
round window code. There are no notations beneath code 69667 excluding modifier 50,
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.and coding guidelines state that if a procedure is not stated it as a bilateral operation (or is
not specified in the guidelines), then it is assumed to be uni-lateral. Since code 69667 is
not noted as being bilateral we must assume it is unilateral. Since the surgeon performed
this procedure on both ears modifier 50 would be correct. Code 69990 has a list of CPT
codes it cannot be coded in conjunction with (see Operating Microscope Coding
Guidelines above code 69990), however, code 69667 is not one of them, therefore,
coding 69990 in addition to code 69667 is correct.
120. B – Code 60512 is an add-on code and beneath it is a list of codes it can be “added
onto”. This list includes code 60260 (option A), code 60240 which is a total
thyroidectomy (Option C), and code 60500 (Option C). Add-on codes are always added
onto a primary procedure code and are never to be used as a primary code or as a single
code (see General Coding Guidelines, Add-on Codes, pg. xi, AMA Professional Edition
2012).
Radiology
121. C – The full CPT code has both components, technical and professional, and if the
physician did not perform both components he cannot be reimbursed for them both. The
TC modifier is used to depict the technical component, which is what the radiologist
often utilizes. Modifier 26 is the professional component, which is what the physician
should append to his CPT code. Modifier 52 is used when a physician must terminate a
procedure or attempts an entire procedure but has unsuccessful results. A full description
of modifiers 26 and 52 can be found in appendix A. Modifier TC in a HCPCS modifier
and should be referenced in the HCPCS book.
122. A – According to the chart provided above code 74176, the guidelines above that, and
the notation beneath code 74178, code 74178 is a standalone code. Guidelines state “do
not report more than one CT of the abdomen or CT of the pelvis for any single session”.
Using the chart the last box across the top should be selected (in bold) “74170 CT of the
Abdomen without contrast followed by with contrast (abbreviated WO//W Contrast)”,
and the top box on the side should be selected, “72192, CT of the Pelvis without contrast
(abbreviated WO Contrast)”. Following both selections to the point where they meet you
end up in the last box in the first (non-bold) column, which contains code “74178”.
Notations beneath this code state, “Do not report 74176 – 74178 in conjunction with
72192 – 72194, 74150– 74170”.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.123. C – The radiologist took 3 views of the patient’s facial bones. The Water’s view
(oblique anterior-posterior), anterior-posterior view, and lateral view. Code 70100 is a
view of the mandible only, which is located in the jaw. Code 70120 describes 3 views of
the mastoid, which is located near the ear and attached to the temporal bone. Code 70150
accurately describes three views taken of unspecified facial bones. Code 70250 describes
skull bones, and not facial bones, being viewed.
124. A – The “Aorta and Arteries” coding guidelines (above code 75600) state that a
diagnostic angiography may be reported with an interventional procedure when
performed together under specific circumstances. One such circumstance is when a prior
report is recorded in the medical record but states there is inadequate visualization of the
anatomy. These guidelines also state modifier 59 would need to be appended to the
diagnostic radiological supervision and interpretation. To find this information you would
use the alphabetic index and look up the term “angiography”. The index would direct you
to “see aortography”. Looking up the term “Aorta, aortography” would lead you to code
75600, and the guidelines above it.
125. B – For the bone biopsy, code 20225 accurately describes a percutaneous, deep bone,
biopsy. Code 20245 describes the same thing; only open instead of percutaneous
(requiring an incision instead of a needle). Code 38221 is a biopsy of the bone marrow
(not the actual bone). Beneath code 20225 the notations state to use either code 77002,
77012, or 77021 for radiological supervision and interpretation. Code 77012 accurately
depicts the CAT scan (computed tomography). Code 76998 describes the use of an
ultrasound instead of a CAT scan, and code 73700 is used when a diagnostic CAT scan is
being taken, not a procedural one.
126. C – High dose radiation (HDR) brachytherapy (AKA: internal radiation) is a type of
radiation that uses high doses of radioactive sources, places them remotely, usually for
short periods of time, and then removes them. The unit that holds the radioactive sources
is called an afterloader and they are delivered to the tumor through channels (usually a
catheter). HDR brachytherapy is different from intracavitary brachytherapy, which places
lower dosed radioactive sources for longer periods of time. Codes for intracavitary
brachytherapy are not determined by the number of channels used, but the number of
radioactive sources delivered (see coding guidelines above code 77750). Interstitial
radiation is similar to intracavitary radiation except that instead of placing the radioactive
elements in a body cavity they are placed within body tissue. Code 77762 (A) describes
intracavitary radiation and code 77777 (D) describes interstitial radiation. Code 77790
(B) is used when charging for the handling of the radioactive elements and equipment
before and after the procedure. Code 77786 (C), accurately describes the procedure of
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.high dose radiation using a remote afterloading device with 2-12 channels (3 were used in
our scenario).
127. A – There is little difference between codes 78451 and 78453. Code 78451 is done by
SPECT and includes attenuation correction and code 78453 is a planar type image. In our
scenario code 78451 is correct. This rules out options B and D. According to the
Radiology Cardiovascular System coding guidelines, (above code 78414), when a
myocardial perfusion study using codes 78451-78454 or 78472-78492 is performed in
conjunction with a stress test, then the stress test should be coded in addition to the study
using codes 93015 – 93018. In our scenario code 93016 is correct because the physician
did not provide the interpretation and report (the cardiologist did).
128. C – The fluid at the back of the fetuses’ neck is also known as the nuchal fold or the
nuchal translucency. When this is too thick it is an indication the fetus may have Down
syndrome. Option A describes an ultrasound for both the fetuses and the mother. In our
scenario only the fetuses are being evaluated though, so this eliminates option A. Option
B also includes a maternal evaluation, so this too is incorrect. Option C correctly
describes the first trimester, fetus evaluation only, is specific to the nuchal translucency,
and includes a transabdominal approach. Add-on code 76814 is also correct when
reporting multiple gestations, (per. notations beneath code 76814, it should be used in
conjunction with code 76813 when reporting multiple gestations). Option D describes a
re-evaluation to confirm a prior finding. In our scenario there is no mention of a prior
screening.
129. A – Code 36598 accurately describes the injection of a contrast material (radiopaque
iodine) into a central venous access device (Hickman’s catheter). This cods also includes
the fluoroscopic imaging and report. According to the notations beneath code 36598 you
are not to code 76000 in conjunction with it, so option C is incorrect. These notations also
state that if you are looking to code “complete diagnostic studies, see 75820, 75825,
75827”, it does not say you must use them in addition to this code though. When reading
the Radiology “Vein and Lymphatic” coding guidelines (above code 75801), it states that
if a “Diagnostic venography is performed at the same time as an interventional procedure
it is NOT separately reportable if it is specifically included in the interventional code
descriptor”. Also, in our scenario there is not clear indication that a full vein study was
done, only a CVAD check. Since code 36598 includes the fluoroscopic imaging and
report there is nothing else to report.
130. A – The radiology coding guidelines (prior to code 70010), in the last paragraph, states
that a signed written report is an integral part of the radiologic service or interpretation.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.Pathology and Laboratory
131. C – When coding a panel every test in that panel must be performed or that panel cannot
be coded. Every code listed in our scenario is listed beneath code 80053 except the TSH
(which is coded using code 84443). Code 80053 also has an additional test for Albumin
listed. Since an Albumin level was not ordered we cannot use code 80053, even with a 52
modifier. This eliminates option A. Option B lists total calcium levels being ordered
instead of ionized calcium levels, so this is incorrect. Option C is correct because every
test listed beneath code 80047 was ordered. In addition to 80047, the lab tests not listed
are accurately coded individually. Option D seems like a good option because it does
accurately capture each test listed in our scenario, however, code 80047 captures a larger
number of tests while still being correct and utilizes fewer codes overall which makes this
the better option. When give the option between choosing a panel or listing each test
individually, you should select the panel.
132. A – Only a gross examination was performed here. There is no mention of a microscopic
examination, so even though an ovary is not specifically listed beneath code 88300, it is
the only code that does not include the microscopic examination.
133. B – Appendix “A” has a full description of each modifier and how it should or should
not be used. Modifier 99 should be used when a single CPT code has two or more
modifiers appended to it. Modifier 99 could be used in place of the multiple modifiers
and the specific modifiers could then be listed elsewhere on a claim form. Modifier 76 is
meant to be used on a service and/or procedure code, not laboratory codes. The use of
modifier 76 eliminates option A. Modifier 91 is meant to be used on laboratory codes,
and is used to when a test is purposely ran more than once on the same day. Modifier 91
should only be appended to the second test and beyond though, and not to the first test
performed (like in option C). Option B is correct because it lists each test once without a
modifier and then the second and third time each of those tests were ran modifier 91 was
appended, indicating that it was actually performed multiple times in one day. If option D
was billed, the insurance company would pay each test only once and then deny the
second and third time the test was run as a “duplicate charge”, this is because the 91
modifier was not appended to indicate they were not duplicates.
134. B – Code 81005 is used for an analysis of the urine for things like protein, glucose, and
bacteria. This is often performed by way of a dip stick and may be accompanied by a
microscopic examination. This is not what is described in our scenario, and eliminates
options A and D. Code 81025 accurately describes a urine test that provides a positive or
negative result, in this case, pregnancy. Code 84702 and 84703 are both used when
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.testing for the growth hormone hCG. Code 84703 is a qualitative test and tests if hCG is
present or not. Code 84702 is a quantitative test, usually run to confirm a pregnancy, and
provides a specific level of the hormone, such as 12500 mIU/ml.
135. D – The first drug test done on the random urine sample is done for all four drugs and is
considered a qualitative test (only giving a negative or positive result). Code 80100 is
incorrect because it involves the use of mobile and non-mobile phases, which were not
mentioned in our scenario. Code 80101 is a simple immunoassay type test which is used
for single drug class, but can be used multiple times to indicate several drug classes. This
is not the correct code though, as our scenario specifically states a multiplexed drug
screening kit was used. Beneath code 80101 there is a notation that states, “for qualitative
analysis by multiplexed screening kit for multiple drugs or drug classes, use 80104”. In
our scenario four different drug classes are being tested for, using a multiplexed
screening kit. A multiplexed screening kit can test for multiple drug classes at once, so
the use of this code for multiple drugs being screened for is correct. Code 80104 could be
used multiple times if multiple “kits” were being used. Modifier 91 (if it were correct),
would be applied to the second, third, and fourth test to avoid a “duplicate” denial from
the insurance company. According to appendix “A”, modifier 91 may be used when a
laboratory test is repeated on the same day to obtain multiple test results. The two drugs
that had a positive result were then tested in a quantitative fashion. Although code 80102
is usually used to confirm an initial drug test, it is used to confirm the presence of the
drug in a more sensitive fashion and may give the specific drug (ex. If a barbiturate test is
positive code 80102 may confirm the test was ran correctly, had the correct retention
time, and that the barbiturate was specific to Amytal). In our scenario this is not the type
of secondary test that was ran though. A quantitative test, such as codes 82205 and
83925, is used to determine the specific level of the drug being tested. Codes 82205 and
83925 can also be located by using the chart (located right before the Pathology and
Laboratory coding guidelines). Using the chart’s farthest column labeled “quantitative”
and locating the specific drug in the left hand column, the two meet in the appropriate
boxes containing these codes.
136. C – CBC stands for complete blood count. Codes for a CBC are 85025 and 85027.
These codes can be located by looking up “CBC” in the index and following the cross –
reference. The codes descriptions in the tabular index explain that a CBC includes Hgb
(hemoglobin), Hct (hematocrit), RBC (red blood cell count), WBC (white blood cell
count), and platelet count. Not included in a CBC is hCG (human chorionic
gonadotropin), which is a human growth hormone that is elevated in pregnancy and often
tested for to confirm the stage of pregnancy.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.137. B – Code 89255 is used to describe a fertilized egg being prepared for implantation into
a woman’s uterus. Code 89258 is the code used when taking an embryo and preserving it
by freezing, (the medical prefix cryo- means cold). This is what the technician did in our
scenario. Code 89268 describes the egg (oocyte) being fertilized with the sperm to form a
zygote. And code 89342 is a code that is used when an embryo is already frozen and is
simply being stored.
138. D – A glucose tolerance test (GTT) requires the patient to have a blood draw prior to the
glucose, they then receive glucose in some form, and then have their blood drawn at
intervals to determine how their body metabolizes the glucose. Code 82951 is the correct
code for this test and includes the pre-glucose blood draw, the glucose dose, and the three
blood draws following the ingestion. Code 82946 is also a tolerance test, but it is for
glucagon and not glucose. Code 82950 is a glucose test that is very similar to the GTT,
but does not require a blood draw prior to the glucose and is usually only checked once, 2
hours after the glucose dose is received. According to appendix “A” modifier 91 should
not be used when a test is re-run due to a testing problem. Because the issue was caused
by the laboratory the patient’s insurance should not be charged for two tests.
139. C- Code 80047 (in options B and D) has both carbon dioxide and sodium, but it contains
ionized calcium not total calcium. This eliminates options B and D. Option A has the
individual codes for carbon dioxide, total calcium, and sodium, but lists no panel codes.
By default option C would be correct. Each code listed beside option C (80048, 80053,
and 80069) are panel codes and each one has all three of the elements listed (carbon
dioxide, total calcium, and sodium).
140. A – This is true in many tests (not just hCH). Generally a qualitative test is a simple test
that usually produces a positive or negative result. A quantitative test is usually a more
sensitive method for testing or confirming a substance and will provide results such as
specific level of the substance being tested for.
Medicine
141. B – The diagnosis coding should include code 873.41 for the simple laceration of the
cheek, code 880.09 for multiple lacerations of the upper arm, and code V01.5 for the
exposure to rabies. According to the laceration coding guidelines (above code 12001),
any laceration located in the same anatomical grouping that requires the same depth of
repair may have their lengths added together for a single code selection. This means that
the two lacerations on the arm (same anatomical location) which had the same type of
repair (both were layered repairs) can have their lengths added together (1cm + 4cm =
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.5cm) and a single code can be selected (code 12032). The single laceration on the face
was a simple repair which is found in the code range 12001 – 12021. The correct
anatomical grouping that includes the face are codes 12011 – 12018, and the single code
for our length is code 12013 (2.6cm – 5.0cm). Because this is a secondary procedure we
append modifier 51. Next we focus on the rabies injection. Choosing the correct code
here will depend on the coding guidelines and on the difference between an immune
globulin immunization and a toxoid vaccination. An immune globulin is a substance that
is administered in order to prevent an illness and provides passive immunization. Passive
immunization protects the body for a small period of time by introducing antibodies into
the blood stream that were donated by another human’s plasma. A toxoid vaccination is
the introduction of a dead virus into the blood stream. This introduction stimulates the
immune system to produce its own antibodies and provide long term protection. In our
scenario a toxoid vaccination was administered. Code 96372 in option A is a code that is
used for a SQ or IM injections, but is specific to therapeutic (curative), prophylactic
(preventative), or diagnostic injections only. The notation beneath this code specifies that
for vaccines/toxoids see codes 96365, 96366, 90471, or 90472. Of these four codes listed
two are for IV infusions (96365 and 96366), and are incorrect. The coding guidelines for
remaining codes (90471 and 90472), are titled “immunization administration for vaccines
and toxoids”, and are located above code 90460. According to these coding guidelines
(second paragraph) codes 90471 (option C) and code 90472 are only for individuals over
the age of 18 (our patient is 5). These guidelines also direct you to use 90460 and 90461.
The description of code 90460 is accurate to our patient’s age, includes the physician’s
counseling of the parents, and describes the vaccination toxoid administration. The first
sentence of these guidelines (still above code 90460) also informs you to use a code from
the 90476 – 90749 range in addition to code 90460. The additional code to describe the
substance being injected is not code 90375 (options A and D), because an immune
globulin was not administered, a toxoid was. Code 90675 is within the specified code
range of 90476 – 90749 and describes an IM rabies vaccination. According to the
Vaccine/Toxoid coding guidelines (above code 90476), in the third paragraph, you are
told that this code (90675) is only for the substance, that the administration code should
come from code range 90460 – 90474 (in our case code 90460), and that modifier 51
should NOT be appended to the substance code.
142. A – The physician did not perform the actual EKG but ordered another individual to run
it, so the physician cannot charge code 93000 which includes reimbursement for
performing the test. In this scenario code 93010 would accurately describe the report and
interpretation. This eliminates options B and D. Normal saline (NS) was also infused for
1 hour and 45 minutes. According to the hydration coding guidelines (above code
96360), normal saline is included in the 96360 and 96361 codes and can be charged by a
physician who is supervising, but not actually performing, the hydration. Code 96360
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.may only be reported once for the initial hour and each increment of time beyond that
must utilize the add-on code 96361. Although the 96361 code description says it is for
each additional hour, a notation beneath the code states that code 96361 may be used for
time increments of 30 minutes or greater if the total infusion time is at least 1 hour and 30
minutes (or longer).
143. D – Reading the “End-Stage Renal Disease Services” coding guidelines (above code
90951) is the key to selecting this code. According to these guidelines code 90960 is
used when providing these services in an out-patient setting (like a physician’s office),
not for home dialysis. This eliminates option A. Code 90966 is for home dialysis and
correctly describes our patient’s age bracket (20 and older), however, according to the
coding guidelines these codes cannot be used for patients receiving services for less than
a full month (30 days). This eliminates option B. Code 90970 is the correct code, but per.
the description of this code, and per. the coding guidelines, this code should be reported
for each day of service outside any inpatient setting. This eliminates option C and makes
option D correct. The physician performed dialysis on the 15 th – 18 th (4 days), and then
resumed dialysis on the 25 th – 31 st (7 days). For the month the physician should charge 11
days.
144. D – There are a lot of coding guidelines (2 1⁄2 pages) that belong to codes 93279 –
93299. These guidelines give specific directives about when these code can and cannot be
used, what other codes they can and cannot be used in conjunction with, time
specifications, and device descriptions. In our scenario the patient has an implantable
cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) that has implantable cardiovascular monitoring (ICM)
functionalities. According to the ICM coding guidelines “when ICM functionality is
included in an ICD device the ICM data and the ICD data are distinct and so the
monitoring process is considered distinct (coded separately). The coding for the ICD
(defibrillator) includes 90 days of remote analysis for a dual lead device and one face-to-
face encounter for programming purposes. Code 93295 is used once every 90 days for
reporting remote analysis of a dual lead defibrillator, and code 93283 is used to describe
the in person encounter for programming and adjustments made to the dual lead
defibrillator. Codes for the ICM include 90 days of remote analysis. Code 93297 is used
to describe remote analysis of an ICM and is reported once for every 30 days. The correct
use of this codes would then be 93297 x3 (30 x 3 = 90days). Although the physician also
provided an in person encounter for the ICM, according to the second paragraph of the
coding guidelines, “A physician may NOT report an in-person and remote interrogation
device evaluation when they are performed during the same period”. These guidelines go
on to say that when both remote and in-person services are rendered in the same time
period to only bill the remote services. In addition, there are also notations beneath codes
93297 and 93290 that state they should not be coded in conjunction with one another.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.145. B – According to the ophthalmology coding guidelines a comprehensive
ophthalmological service includes history, general medical observation, external
examinations (lids, sclera, conjunctiva, etc.) and ophthalmoscopic examinations (slit
lamp/Goldman 3-mirror lens), gross visual fields, and basic sensorimotor examinations
(vertical prism bars, function of ocular motor system, etc.). It also often includes
cycloplegia (drug used for dilation of pupils), and tonometry (measures intraocular
pressure; “17 mm on each eye”). It always includes diagnostic and treatment plans (dx:
cataracts and macular degeneration; tx: continued vitamins and surgery) as well. In
addition to this description the coding guidelines also specify that “itemization of
services, such as slit lamp examinations, keratometry, routine ophthalmoscopy,
retinoscopy, tonometry, and motor evaluation is not applicable”. This means that since
our scenario meets all the requirements to code an established, comprehensive,
ophthalmological service, that we cannot use additional codes (such as 92060 or 92081),
as they are already bundled into our service code (92014).
146. A – The rules regarding “separate procedures” and the 59 modifier can be located under
the third title in the medicine coding guidelines, titled “Separate Procedure”. These rules
apply to all CPT codes, (not just those in the medicine chapter), and the stipulations are
repeated in several other coding guidelines as well.
147. B – The simplest way to code this would be to code for one day and then just multiple
that for the number of visits in the month. When coding for a single day you would use
code 99601 as the initial peritoneal infusion code and code 99602 for the additional hour.
These codes would be used on all three days the nurse visits and code 99509 would be
added on once each week for the additional services performed on Fridays. Code 90966
would not be correct because this code is only for physician use (not nurses). Code 99512
is also incorrect because this code is for hemodialysis and not peritoneal dialysis. Beneath
this code there is even a notation stating that if coding for home infusion of peritoneal
dialysis to use codes 99601 and 99602. The number of Mondays, Wednesdays, and
Fridays in the month add up to 13. It would be incorrect to code one initial infusion code
(99601) and the rest of the visits as code (99602 x25), because code 99601 states that it
should be used “per visit”. This means that code 99601 should be used for each
individual date of service with the add-on code 99602 for each date of service. (99601
x13 and 99602 x13). In a month there were also 4 Fridays and so code 99509 would be
coded as 99509 x4.
148. D –Code 93923 includes what is described in our scenario, but also has additional
studies as well (ex. 3 levels instead of 2 levels of plethymograohy volume were taken, 3
or more oxygen tension measurements are taken instead of 2. Etc.) This eliminates
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.options A and B. Code 93922 accurately describes what is performed in our scenario.
Requirements for using this code are also given in the coding guidelines (above code
93880), under the heading “Noninvasive Vascular Diagnostic Studies”, in the 5 th
paragraph titled, “Limited studies for lower extremity”. These guidelines stipulations
include items stated in our questions, such as “ ABI’s (ankle/brachial indices) being taken
at the posterior (back) and anterior (front) lower aspects of the tibial and tibial/dorsalis
pedis arteries; Plethymography levels; Oxygen tension reading, etc. The notation beneath
code 93922 also states that if a single extremity, (instead of both), are being studied to
append modifier 52 to the procedure code.
149. B – Code 91010 is a manometric study, but it is of the esophagus (throat) and/or where
the stomach and esophagus meet (gastroesophageal junction; gastro meaning stomach
and esophageal meaning the esophagus). Code 91020, (Gastric motility), is also a
manometric study, and accurately describes our scenario. The term “gastric” (or gastro),
means the stomach and the word “motility” is a biological term referring to the ability to
move. In this case it is referring to the ability of food to move through the stomach. Code
91022 is similar to code 91020, except the anatomical location is different, it is studying
the duodenum. The duodenum is the first portion of the small intestine, and code 91022 is
the study of movement through this. Code 0240T is a category III code located between
category II codes and Appendix A in the back of the CPT book. Code 0240T is also a
motility study but this particular code is for study of just the esophagus and/or
gastroesophageal junction, and does not include the stomach and gastric outlet into the
small intestine.
150. A – To the left of each code are listed any coding conventions. Conventions each have
their own meaning which can be found with a short description at the bottom of each
page or in their full description at the front of the CPT book. The coding convention that
looks like a lightning bolt means “FDA approval pending”. Codes 90666, 90667, and
90668 each have this convention listed beside them. Code 90664 does not have this
coding convention listed beside it, hence we know it has FDA approval.
© 2011-2014 http://www.medicalbillingandmedicalcoding.com
This material may not be reproduced, displayed, distributed, or modified in whole or in part without the express prior written permission of the copyright holder. All rights reserved.
